Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB178.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of July 2, 2010 (P.L.266, No.44), known as the Protecting Pennsylvania's Investments Act, is amended to read:AN ACTProviding for divestiture by the State Treasurer, the State Employees' Retirement System and the Public School Employees' Retirement System of investments in companies doing business in Iran and Sudan and in assault weapons manufacturers.Section 2. Section 2 of the act is amended by adding definitions to read:123456789101112131415161718192021 Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Assault weapon." The term includes all of the following:(1) A semiautomatic center fire rifle capable of accepting detachable magazines and a pistol grip protruding conspicuously below the weapon's action, a thumbhole stock or folding or telescopic stock, a flash suppressor, grenade launcher or flare launcher or a forward pistol grip.(2) A semiautomatic center fire rifle with an overall length of less than 30 inches.(3) A semiautomatic center fire rifle with a fixed magazine capable of holding more than 10 rounds of ammunition.(4) A semiautomatic pistol capable of accepting detachable magazines and a threaded barrel, a second handgrip, a capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside the pistol grip or a shroud attached to, or partially or completely encircling, the barrel allowing the bearer to fire the weapon without burning the bearer's hand, except for a slide enclosing the barrel.(5) A semiautomatic pistol with a fixed magazine having the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds.(6) A semiautomatic shotgun having a folding or telescoping stock, a pistol grip protruding conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon, a thumbhole stock or a vertical handgrip.(7) A semiautomatic shotgun with the ability to accept 20250SB0178PN0117 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 detachable magazines.(8) A shotgun with a revolving cylinder.(9) A part or combination of parts designed or intended to convert a firearm into an assault weapon or any combination of parts from which an assault weapon may be readily assembled if the parts are in the possession of or under the control of the same person.(10) A detachable ammunition-feeding device with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds of ammunition. The term does not include:(i) a feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it cannot accommodate more than 10 rounds;(ii) a .22 caliber tube ammunition-feeding device; or(iii) a tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action firearm.(11) A device designed or manufactured for the sole purpose of accelerating the rate of fire of a semiautomatic firearm to simulate the rate of fire of an automatic weapon."Assault weapons manufacturer." A person who manufactures assault weapons."Assault weapons manufacturing activities." The manufacturing of assault weapons.* * *"Substantial action specific to assault weapons manufacturing." Adopting, publicizing and implementing a formal plan to cease assault weapons manufacturing activities within one year and to refrain from any new assault weapons manufacturing activities.20250SB0178PN0117 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 6.1. Identification of assault weapons manufacturers.(a) Best effort.--Within 90 days after the effective date of this section, a public fund shall make its best effort to identify all assault weapons manufacturers in which the public fund has direct holdings. A public fund shall review, as appropriate in the public fund's judgment, publicly available information regarding assault weapons manufacturers, including information provided by nonprofit organizations, research firms, international organizations and government entities.(b) Assembly.--By the first meeting of a public fund following the time period under subsection (a), the public fund shall assemble all assault weapons manufacturers into an assault weapons manufacturers list.Section 6.2. Required actions related to assault weapons manufacturers.(a) Procedure.--A public fund shall adhere to the procedures under this section for determining companies on the public fund's assault weapons manufacturers list that qualify for divestment.(b) Engagement.--(1) For each assault weapons manufacturer on a public fund's assault weapons manufacturers list in which the public fund has direct holdings, the public fund shall send a written notice informing the assault weapons manufacturer of the assault weapons manufacturing activities which have resulted in this determination and that the assault weapons manufacturer may become subject to divestment by the public fund. The notice must inform the assault weapons manufacturer 20250SB0178PN0117 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the opportunity to clarify the assault weapons manufacturing activities and encourage the assault weapons manufacturer, within 180 days of the date of receipt of the notice, to cease the assault weapons manufacturing activities in order to avoid qualifying for divestment by the public fund. The notice shall be sent no later than 120 days after the effective date of this section.(2) If, within 180 days of the date of receipt of a notice under paragraph (1), an assault weapons manufacturer announces by public disclosure substantial action specific to assault weapons manufacturing, the public fund may maintain its holdings, but the assault weapons manufacturer shall remain on the assault weapons manufacturers list pending completion of the assault weapons manufacturer's cessation of assault weapons manufacturing activities. Following completion of an assault weapons manufacturer's cessation of assault weapons manufacturing activities, the public fund shall remove the assault weapons manufacturer from the public fund's assault weapons manufacturers list.(c) Divestment.--(1) If, after 180 days following the effective date of receipt of the notice under subsection (b)(1), an assault weapons manufacturer has not announced by public disclosure substantial action specific to assault weapons manufacturing as specified in the notice, or the public fund determines or becomes aware that the assault weapons manufacturer continues to have assault weapons manufacturing activities, the public fund, within 26 months after the 180-day period, shall sell, redeem, divest or withdraw from its direct holdings all securities of the assault weapons manufacturer.20250SB0178PN0117 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If a public fund determines or becomes aware that an assault weapons manufacturer that ceased assault weapons manufacturing activities following engagement under subsection (b) has resumed the manufacturing, the public fund shall send a written notice to the assault weapons manufacturer under subsection (b), and the assault weapons manufacturer shall be immediately placed onto the public fund's assault weapons manufacturers list.(3) A public fund shall monitor an assault weapons manufacturer that has announced by public disclosure substantial action specific to assault weapons manufacturing. If, after one year, the public fund determines or becomes aware that the assault weapons manufacturer has not implemented the plan, the public fund, within 26 months after the expiration of the one-year period, shall sell, redeem, divest or withdraw from its direct holdings all securities of the assault weapons manufacturer.(d) Prohibition.--A public fund may not acquire securities of an assault weapons manufacturer on the public fund's assault weapons manufacturers list.(e) Excluded securities.--Nothing in this act shall apply to the public fund's holdings in alternative investments or indirect holdings.Section 6.3. Reporting relating to assault weapons manufacturers.(a) Duty of public fund.--A public fund shall, no earlier than one year after the effective date of this section, provide a report to the Governor, the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and each member of the boards of the Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement 20250SB0178PN0117 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 System, the State Employees' Retirement System and the Public School Employees' Retirement System. The report shall include the items required under subsection (b). The report shall be made available to the public.(b) Contents.--The report under subsection (a) shall include the most recent assault weapons manufacturers list and all of the following:(1) A summary of correspondence with assault weapons manufacturers engaged by the public fund under section 6.2.(2) All investments sold, redeemed, divested or withdrawn in compliance with section 6.2(c), the costs and expenses of the transfers and a determination of net gain or net loss on account of the transactions incurred under this act.(3) All prohibited investments under section 6.2(d).(4) A list of all publicly traded securities held by the public fund.(c) Update.--A public fund shall do all of the following:(1) Annually update, based on evolving information under subsection (b), and make publicly available the public fund's assault weapons manufacturers list.(2) Provide a copy of the list under paragraph (1), including updates, to all other public funds.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0178PN0117 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324